California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(C) (i) Only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained for this subparagraph, the department may condition a facility’s receipt of the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate pursuant to this paragraph for the 2021
 calendar year upon that facility’s good faith efforts to comply with any requirements related to the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency described in All Facility Letters issued by the State Department of Public Health. The department shall consult with the State Department of Public Health in determining a facility’s compliance for purposes of this subparagraph.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “COVID-19 Public Health Emergency” shall mean the federal Public Health Emergency declaration made pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code on January 30, 2020, entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” and any renewal of that declaration.

(14) (A) For the 2022 calendar year, the annual aggregate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate that is
 required for the purposes of this article shall be 2.4 percent plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates.

(B) The aggregate, weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increase specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.

(C) (i) Only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained for this subparagraph, the department may condition a facility’s receipt of the annual increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate pursuant to this paragraph for the 2022 calendar year upon that facility’s good faith efforts to comply with any requirements related to the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency described in All Facility Letters issued by the State Department of Public
 Health. The department shall consult with the State Department of Public Health in determining a facility’s compliance for purposes of this subparagraph.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “COVID-19 Public Health Emergency” shall mean the federal Public Health Emergency declaration made pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code on January 30, 2020, entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” and any renewal of such declaration.

(15) (A) For the 2022 and 2023 calendar years, inclusive, the reimbursement rate established for a skilled nursing facility pursuant to this section shall continue to be increased by the temporary Medicaid payments associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency in effect for that facility on July 31, 2020, or an amount equivalent
 to those temporary increased Medicaid payments should the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency expire prior to December 31, 2023.

(B) For the 2023 calendar year, 85 percent of the amount of temporary Medicaid payments associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency, or amounts equivalent to those temporary increased Medicaid payments should the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency expire prior to December 31, 2023, received by a facility shall be spent on additional labor costs, including, but not limited to, increased wages or benefits, shift incentive payments, staff retention bonuses, pay differential for workers employed by more than one facility, and overtime payments to nonmanagerial workers. Such increased wages or benefits, shift incentive payments, staff retention bonuses, pay differential for workers employed by more than one facility, overtime payments to nonmanagerial workers or other additional labor costs shall qualify for this
 purpose if they were either of the following:

(i) Implemented prior to January 1, 2023, and continued during the 2023 calendar year.

(ii) Implemented on or after January 1, 2023.

(C) If the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency is renewed past December 31, 2023, the temporary Medicaid payments for skilled nursing facilities associated with the COVID-19 Public Health Emergency, as authorized in the Medi-Cal State Plan, shall cease on December 31, 2023, subject to subdivision (h).

(D) For purposes of this subparagraph, “COVID-19 Public Health Emergency” shall mean the federal Public Health Emergency declaration made pursuant to Section 247d of Title 42 of the United States Code on January 30, 2020, entitled “Determination that a Public Health Emergency Exists
 Nationwide as the Result of the 2019 Novel Coronavirus,” and any renewal of such declaration.

(16) (A) For the 2023 calendar year, the maximum annual aggregate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for the purposes of this article shall be the following, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates:

(i) For the labor cost category as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the annual aggregate increase shall be 5 percent.

(ii) For each of the indirect care nonlabor cost, administrative cost, capital cost, and direct passthrough categories as specified in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the annual aggregate increase shall be 2 percent.

(B) The aggregate, weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate increases specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.

(17) (A) Beginning in the 2024 calendar year, the department shall establish a workforce adjustment, as further described in paragraphs (18), (19) and (20), for a skilled nursing facility that meets workforce standards, as determined by the department in consultation with representatives from the long-term care industry, organized labor, and consumer advocates.

(B) The workforce standards may include, but need not be limited to, criteria such as maintaining a collective bargaining agreement or comparable, legally binding, written
 commitment with its direct and indirect care staff, payment of a prevailing wage for its direct and indirect care staff, payment of an average salary above minimum wage, participation in a statewide, multiemployer joint labor-management committee of skilled nursing facility employers and workers, or other factors, as determined by the department in consultation with the stakeholders listed above. The criteria may vary for facilities based on facility demographics or other factors such as facility size, location or other factor, as determined by the department in consultation with the stakeholders listed above.

(18) (A) For the 2024 calendar year, the maximum annual increase in the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for the purposes of this article shall be the following, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates:

(i) For the
 labor cost category specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the annual increase shall be determined as follows:

(I) If the department determines the facility meets the criteria described in paragraph (17), the annual increase for the facility shall not have a percentage growth limit applied to the facility’s audited costs within the labor cost category trended to the 2024 calendar year.

(II) If the facility does not meet the criteria described in paragraph (17), an annual increase of up to 5 percent shall be applied to the labor cost category rate included in the facility’s 2023 calendar year rate based on audited cost reports trended to the calendar 2024 year.

(ii) For the 2024 calendar year, for each of the indirect care nonlabor cost, administrative cost, capital cost, and direct
 passthrough categories as specified in paragraphs (2) through (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the annual aggregate increase in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for those categories shall be 1 percent. Additionally, for the 2024 calendar year, an amount equivalent to the annual aggregate increase of 1 percent calculated pursuant to this clause, as determined by the department, shall be used to supplement the funds available for payments made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14126.024.

(B) The Medi-Cal reimbursement rate specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.

(19) (A) For the 2025 calendar year, the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for the purposes of this
 article shall be the following, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal mandates:

(i) The rate for the labor cost category as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023 shall be determined as follows:

(I) If the department determines the facility meets the criteria described in paragraph (17), the facility’s rate for the labor cost category shall equal the facility’s audited costs for the labor cost category that would have been used for calculating the facility’s 2024 calendar year rate had the facility met the criteria described in paragraph (17) in the 2024 calendar year increased by up to 5 percent for the 2025 calendar year based on audited cost reports trended to the 2025 calendar year.

(II) If the facility does not meet the criteria described in paragraph (17),
 the facility’s rate for the labor cost category shall equal the labor cost category rate included in the facility’s 2023 calendar year rate increased by up to 5 percent for each of the 2024 and 2025 calendar years based on audited cost reports trended to the applicable calendar year.

(ii) For the 2025 calendar year, for each of the indirect care nonlabor cost, administrative cost, capital cost, and direct passthrough categories as specified in paragraphs (2) through (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the facility’s rate for those categories shall equal the reimbursement included in the facility’s 2024 calendar year rate for those categories increased by an aggregate of 1 percent in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for those categories. Additionally, for the 2025 calendar year, an amount equivalent to the annual aggregate increase of 1 percent calculated pursuant to this clause, as determined by the
 department, shall be used to supplement the funds available for payments made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14126.024.

(B) The Medi-Cal reimbursement rate specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.

(20) (A) For the 2026 and 2027 calendar years, the Medi-Cal reimbursement rate required for the purposes of this article shall be the following, plus the projected cost of complying with new state or federal
 mandates:

(i) The rate for labor cost category as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023 shall be determined as follows:

(I) If the department determines the facility meets the criteria described in paragraph (17), the facility’s rate for the labor cost category shall equal the facility’s audited costs within the labor cost category that would have been used for calculating the facility’s 2024 calendar year rate had the facility met the criteria in the 2024 calendar year increased by up to 5 percent for each of the 2025, 2026, and 2027 calendar years based on audited cost reports trended to the applicable calendar year.

(II) If the facility does not meet the criteria described in paragraph (17), the facility’s rate for the labor cost category shall equal the labor cost category rate included in the facility’s 2023 calendar year rate increased by up to 5 percent for each of the 2024, 2025,
 2026, and 2027 calendar years based on audited cost reports trended to the applicable calendar year.

(ii) For the 2026 and 2027 calendar years, for each of the indirect care nonlabor cost, administrative cost, capital cost, and direct passthrough categories as specified in paragraphs (2) through (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 14126.023, the facility’s rate for those categories shall equal the reimbursement included in the facility’s 2025 calendar year rate for those categories increased by an aggregate of 1 percent in the weighted average Medi-Cal reimbursement rate for those
 categories.

(B) The Medi-Cal reimbursement rate specified in subparagraph (A) may be adjusted by the department as it deems necessary to obtain any applicable federal approval, and shall not exceed the applicable federal upper payment limit.

(d) (1) The department may modify any methodology or other provision specified in this article to the extent it deems necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations, to obtain or maintain federal approval, or to ensure federal financial participation is available or is not otherwise jeopardized, provided the modification does not violate the spirit, purposes, and intent of this article.

(2) If the department determines that a modification is necessary pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall consult with affected providers and
 stakeholders to the extent practicable.

(3) In the event of a modification made pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall notify affected providers, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature within 10 business days of the modification.

(e) The rate methodology shall cease to be implemented after December 31, 2027.

(f) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature that the implementation of this article result in individual access to appropriate long-term care services, quality resident care, decent wages and benefits for nursing home
 workers, a stable workforce, provider compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements, and administrative efficiency.

(2) Not later than December 1, 2006, the California State Auditor’s Office shall conduct an accountability evaluation of the department’s progress toward implementing a facility-specific reimbursement system, including a review of data to ensure that the new system is appropriately reimbursing facilities within specified cost categories and a review of the fiscal impact of the new system on the General Fund.

(3) Not later than January 1, 2007, to the extent information is available for the three years immediately preceding the implementation of this article, the department shall provide baseline information in a report to the Legislature on all of the following:

(A) The number and
 percent of freestanding skilled nursing facilities that complied with minimum staffing requirements.

(B) The staffing levels before the implementation of this article.

(C) The staffing retention rates before the implementation of this article.

(D) The numbers and percentage of freestanding skilled nursing facilities with findings of immediate jeopardy, substandard quality of care, or actual harm, as determined by the certification survey of each freestanding skilled nursing facility conducted before the implementation of this article.

(E) The number of freestanding skilled nursing facilities that received state citations and the number and class of citations issued during calendar year 2004.

(F) The average wage and benefits for employees before the implementation of this article.

(4) Not later than January 1, 2009, the department shall provide a report to the Legislature that does both of the following:

(A) Compares the information required in paragraph (2) to that same information two years after the implementation of this article.

(B) Reports on the extent to which residents who had expressed a preference to return to the community, as provided in Section 1418.81 of the Health and Safety Code, were able to return to the community.

(5) The department may contract for the reports required under this subdivision.

(g) (1) Beginning with the
 2021 calendar year, and continuing each calendar year thereafter, a skilled nursing facility shall demonstrate its compliance with the following Medi-Cal funded requirements upon request by, and in the form and manner specified by, the department:

(A) Direct care service hours per patient day requirements pursuant to Section 1276.65 of the Health and Safety Code and as enforced pursuant to Section 14126.022.

(B) Applicable minimum wage laws.

(C) Wage passthrough requirements pursuant to Section 14110.6 of this code and Section 1338 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) If the department determines that a skilled nursing facility has not demonstrated satisfactory compliance pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1), in consultation with State
 Department of Public Health or other applicable state agencies and departments if necessary, the department shall assess a monthly penalty up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for that skilled nursing facility, except as provided in paragraph (3), until the facility demonstrates its compliance to the department. The penalty amounts assessed pursuant to this subdivision in any one calendar year shall be limited to 4 percent of the total Medi-Cal revenue received by the skilled nursing facility in the previous calendar year. If the department determines a facility is out of compliance for multiple calendar years, additional penalty amounts may be assessed for each respective calendar year.

(3) The department may waive a portion or all of the penalties assessed pursuant to this subdivision with respect to a petitioning skilled nursing facility in the event the department determines, in its sole discretion, that the facility has demonstrated that
 imposing the full penalty has a high likelihood of creating an undue financial hardship for the facility or creates a significant financial difficulty in providing services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(h) In implementing this article, the department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary. This article shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 61, Sec. 3.   (SB 165)   Effective July 6, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.    Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.034.

(a) (1) The department shall convene a workgroup of interested stakeholders to make recommendations to the department to ensure compliance with the intent of this article, as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 14126.02.

(2) (A) Interested stakeholders shall include consumers or their representatives, or both, including current or former skilled nursing facility residents, and family members of current or former skilled nursing facility residents, or both, seniors or their representatives, or both, skilled nursing facility representatives, labor representatives, and people with disabilities and disability rights advocates.

(B) A stakeholder workgroup of 18 members shall be convened representing interested stakeholders from the groups listed in subparagraph (A), with six members selected from each of the following areas of interest:

(i) Consumers.

(ii) Skilled nursing facility labor.

(iii) Skilled nursing facilities.

(C) Interested stakeholders within each of the areas of interest in subparagraph (B) shall nominate and select six members within their area of interest to serve on the stakeholder workgroup to represent their interests.

(D) The stakeholder workgroup shall also include representatives from the department, the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman, the State Department of Public Health, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, with members appointed by their respective directors, or their designee, and may also include legislative staff, academics, and other state department representatives, including, but not limited to, representatives from the California Department of Aging and the State Department of Developmental Services.

(b) (1) Each stakeholder workgroup meeting shall be
 chaired by a facilitator from an organization independent of the department and any of the stakeholder groups, to the extent that foundation funding is made available for this purpose. If no funds are made available for this purpose, the department shall facilitate the stakeholder workgroup meetings.

(2) The consumers, skilled nursing facility labor, and skilled nursing facility stakeholder workgroup members shall each select one representative who will meet with the department and the facilitator to develop meeting agendas after having solicited input from each representative’s respective stakeholder group.

(3) To the extent that foundation funding is made available, stakeholder workgroup members shall receive reimbursement for any actual, necessary, and reasonable expenses incurred in connection with their duties as members of the workgroup.

(c) The department shall assign staff as needed to assist the stakeholder workgroup in carrying out its responsibilities.

(d) In developing recommendations, the stakeholder workgroup shall consider the structure of, and potential changes to, the facility-specific ratesetting system, developed pursuant to Section 14126.023, that may improve the quality of resident care. The stakeholder workgroup members may take into consideration the following factors, or any other factors deemed relevant to ensure the quality of resident care:

(1) Skilled nursing facility staffing levels, including, but not limited to, compliance with existing staffing requirements.

(2) Skilled nursing facility staff wages and benefits, including, but not limited to, geographic
 disparities in wages and benefits.

(3) Skilled nursing facility staff turnover and retention.

(4) Deficiency reports issued as a result of both surveys and complaint investigations, to the extent that they may be disclosed as public records, and the enforcement actions taken under federal certification and state licensing laws and regulations.

(5) Skilled nursing facility compliance with assessments required to ascertain residents’ preference for, and ability to return to, the community as required by Section 1418.81 of the Health and Safety Code, including necessary followthrough to assure care necessary for a resident to transition out of skilled nursing facility care and into the community.

(6) The extent to which this article encourages compliance
 with the United States Supreme Court decision in Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel. Zimring (1999) 527 U.S. 581, including using the ratesetting system to increase Olmstead compliance.

(7) Health care efficiency.

(8) Health care safety.

(9) The extent to which a pay-for-performance program may contribute to improving the quality of resident care and appropriate performance measures for a pay-for-performance program.

(10) Preventable emergency room visits and rehospitalizations.

(11) Resident and family satisfaction with care and resident’s quality of life, including improvements on ways to measure satisfaction.

(12) Recommendations for
 methods to evaluate the effectiveness of the facility-specific ratesetting system, defined in Section 14126.023, in meeting the intent of this article, pursuant to Section 14126.02.

(13) Additional quality measures, including, but not limited to, adequate nutrition and ready availability of durable medical equipment.

(e) The department shall convene the stakeholder workgroup no later than one month following the effective date of this section. The stakeholder workgroup shall meet a minimum of six times through December 31, 2008. Subcommittees may be convened and meet as necessary.

(f) In addition to recommendations provided during stakeholder workgroup meetings, individual members of the stakeholder workgroup and any other interested stakeholders may provide to the department any additional written recommendations on
 the items considered in the stakeholder workgroup meetings.

(g) The department shall provide technical assistance to the stakeholder workgroup to evaluate the feasibility of its recommendations so that the stakeholder workgroup will have the benefit of the department’s analysis when discussing and reviewing proposed recommendations.

(h) The department shall review and analyze all recommendations from the stakeholder workgroup, individual workgroup members, and any other interested stakeholders, and, no later than March 1, 2009, the department shall deliver to the Legislature, both of the following:

(1) The complete recommendations of the stakeholder workgroup, individual workgroup members, and any other interested stakeholders.

(2) The department’s
 analysis of the feasibility to implement the proposed recommendations.

(i) (1) The stakeholder workgroup may continue to meet to carry out its responsibilities pursuant to subdivision (d) for an extension period of up to one year. During this extension period, the stakeholder workgroup shall meet at least quarterly as agreed by the department and those members selected pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(2) During the extension period the stakeholder workgroup’s activities may include assisting the department or Legislature, or both, to enact improvements to the ratesetting system.

(j) The department shall seek partnership with one or more independent, nonprofit groups or foundations, academic institutions, or governmental entities providing grants for health-related activities, to
 support stakeholder workgroup efforts.

(k) The department shall seek necessary legislative changes to implement the stakeholder workgroup’s recommendations that the department determines are feasible to implement as part of the reauthorization of this section.

(l) The department may meet the intent of this article, as stated in subdivision (a) of Section 14126.02, by using the stakeholder workgroup’s recommendations in order to design an evaluation of the effectiveness of the facility-specific ratesetting system established pursuant to Section 14126.023.

(m) Implementation and administration of this section is not dependent on the availability of foundation funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 208.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (a) of Section 14126.035.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.035.

(a) This article shall remain operative only as long as Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 1324.20) of Chapter 2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, which imposes a skilled nursing facility quality assurance fee continues as approved by the federal Centers for
 Medicare and Medicaid Services pursuant to Section 1324.27 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) In the event of a final judicial determination made by any state or federal court that is not appealed, or by a court of appellate jurisdiction that is not further appealed, in any action by any party or a final determination by the administrator of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that federal financial participation is not available with respect to any payment made under the methodology implemented pursuant to this article because the methodology is invalid, unlawful, or is contrary to any provision of federal law or regulations, or of state law, this section shall become inoperative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 875, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 2004.   Inoperative after December 31, 2027, pursuant to Section 14126.036.   Note: Inoperative clause in subd. (a) affects Article 3.8, commencing with Section 14126.)
-------------------------------------------

14126.036.

(a) This article shall become inoperative after December 31, 2027, except that the department shall be authorized to conduct all necessary closeout activities after this date and to continue implementing this article for any rate period before December 31, 2027.

(b) This section shall be repealed on January 1, 2029, or on the date that the director certifies to the Secretary of State that all necessary closeout activities have been completed pursuant to subdivision (a), whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 61, Sec. 4.   (SB 165)   Effective July 6, 2026.   Conditionally repealed on or after January 1,  2029, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.91. Medi-Cal Emergency Medical Transportation Reimbursement Act [14129. - 14129.7.]

14129.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Annual quality assurance fee rate” means the quality assurance fee assessed on each emergency medical transport during each applicable state fiscal year.

(b) “Aggregate fee schedule amount” means the product of the fee-for-service add-on increase described in Section 14129.3 and the Medi-Cal emergency medical transports, including both fee-for-service transports paid by the department and managed care transports paid by Medi-Cal managed care health plans, utilizing the billing codes for emergency medical transport for the state fiscal year.

(c) “Available fee amount” shall be calculated as the sum of the following:

(1) The amount deposited in the Medi-Cal Emergency Medical Transport Fund established under Section 14129.2 during the applicable state fiscal year, less the amounts described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14129.2.

(2) Any federal financial participation obtained as a result of the deposit of the amount described in paragraph (1) in the Medi-Cal Emergency Medical Transport Fund, created pursuant to Section 14129.2, for the applicable state fiscal year.

(d) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(e) “Director” means the Director of Health Care Services.

(f) “Effective state medical assistance percentage” means a ratio of the aggregate expenditures from state-only sources for the Medi-Cal program divided by the aggregate expenditures from state and federal sources for the Medi-Cal program for a state fiscal year.

(g) “Emergency medical transport” means the act of transporting an individual from any point of origin to the nearest medical facility capable of meeting the emergency medical needs of the patient by an emergency medical transport provider by means of an ambulance licensed, operated, and equipped in accordance with applicable state or local statutes, ordinances, or regulations that are billed with
 billing codes A0429 BLS Emergency, A0427 ALS
 Emergency, A0434 Specialty Care Transport, A0225 Neonatal Emergency Transport, and A0433 ALS2, and any equivalent, predecessor, or successor billing codes as may be determined by the director. “Emergency medical transport” excludes transportation of beneficiaries by passenger car, taxicabs, litter vans, wheelchair vans, other forms of public or private conveyances, and transportation by an air ambulance provider. An “emergency medical transport” does not occur when, following evaluation of a patient, a transport is not provided.

(h) “Gross receipts” means gross payments received as patient care revenue for emergency medical transports, determined on a cash basis of accounting. “Gross receipts” includes all payments received as patient care revenue for emergency medical transports, including payments for billing codes A0429
 BLS Emergency, A0427 ALS Emergency, and A0433 ALS2, and any equivalent, predecessor, or successor billing codes as may be determined by the director, and any other ancillary billing codes associated with emergency medical transport as may be determined by the director. “Gross receipts” excludes supplemental amounts received pursuant to Sections 14105.94 or 14105.945.

(i) “Emergency medical transport provider” means any provider of emergency medical transports, except that during any Medi-Cal managed care rating period for which Section 14105.945 is implemented “emergency medical transport provider” shall exclude “eligible providers” as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.945 for purposes of this article.

(j) “Emergency medical transport provider subject to the fee” means all emergency medical transport providers who bill and receive patient care revenue from the provision of emergency medical transports, except emergency medical transport providers that are exempt pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14129.6.

(k) “Medi-Cal managed care health plan” means a “managed health care
 plan” as that term is defined in subdivision (ab) of Section 14169.51.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 544, Sec. 3.   (AB 1705)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 14129.7.   Repealed conditionally as provided in Section 14129.7.)
-------------------------------------------

14129.1.

(a) (1) The department shall establish the manner and format for emergency medical transport providers to report the data required pursuant to this section.

(2) The department may establish an Internet Web site for the submission of reports required by this section.

(3) The department may require a certification by each emergency medical transport provider under penalty of perjury of the truth of the reports required under this section. Upon written notice to an emergency medical transport provider, the department may impose a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) per day against an emergency medical transport provider for every day that an emergency
 medical transport provider fails to make a report required by this section within five days of the date upon which the report was due. Any funds resulting from a penalty imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the Medi-Cal Emergency Medical Transport Fund created pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14129.2.

(b) Each emergency medical transport provider shall report to the department data on the number of actual emergency medical transports by payer type, including, without limitation, Medi-Cal fee-for-service emergency medical transports and Medi-Cal managed care emergency medical transports per quarter, as follows:

(1) For each quarter beginning on July 1, 2015, through the quarter beginning on July 1, 2017, inclusive, the data shall be submitted on or before October 15, 2017.

(2) For the quarter
 beginning on October 1, 2017, and continuing each quarter thereafter, the data shall be submitted on or before the 45th day after the last day of the applicable quarter.

(c) Each emergency medical transport provider shall report to the department data on the gross receipts received from the provision of emergency medical transports per state fiscal year, as follows:

(1) For the state fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2015, and July 1, 2016, the data shall be submitted on or before October 15, 2017.

(2) For each state fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2017, and continuing each state fiscal year thereafter, the data shall be submitted on or before the 45th day after the last day of the applicable state fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 773, Sec. 2.   (SB 523)   Effective October 13, 2017.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 14129.7.   Repealed conditionally as provided in Section 14129.7.)
-------------------------------------------

14129.2.

(a) (1) Commencing with the state fiscal quarter beginning on July 1, 2018, and continuing each state fiscal quarter thereafter for which this article is implemented, there shall be imposed a quality assurance fee for each emergency medical transport provided by each emergency medical transport provider subject to the fee in accordance with this section.

(2) The director shall ensure that the quality assurance fee per emergency medical transport imposed pursuant to this article is collected.

(b) (1) On or before June 15, 2018, and continuing each June 15 thereafter for which this
 article is implemented, the director shall calculate the annual quality assurance fee rate applicable to the following state fiscal year based on the most recently collected data from emergency medical transport providers pursuant to Section 14129.1. The director may correct any identified material or significant errors in the data collected from emergency medical transport providers pursuant to Section 14129.1 for the purposes of calculating the annual quality assurance fee rate. The director’s determination whether to exercise the director’s discretion to correct any data pursuant to this paragraph shall not be subject to judicial review, except that an emergency medical transport provider may bring a writ of mandate under Section 1085 of the Code of Civil Procedure to rectify an abuse of discretion by the director in correcting that emergency medical transport provider’s data when that
 correction results in a greater fee amount for that provider pursuant to this section.

(A) For the state fiscal year beginning on July 1, 2018, the annual quality assurance fee rate shall be calculated by multiplying the projected total annual gross receipts for all emergency medical transport providers subject to the fee by 5.1 percent, which resulting product shall be divided by the projected total annual emergency medical transports by all emergency medical transport providers subject to the fee for the state fiscal year.

(B) For state fiscal years beginning July 1, 2019, and continuing each state fiscal year thereafter, the annual quality assurance fee rate shall be calculated by a ratio, the numerator of which shall be the sum of: (i) the product of the projected aggregate fee
 schedule amount and the effective state medical assistance percentage and (ii) the amount described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) for the state fiscal year, and the denominator of which shall be 90 percent of the projected total annual emergency medical transports by all emergency medical transport providers subject to the fee for the state fiscal year.

(2) On or before June 15, 2018, and continuing each June 15 thereafter for which this article is implemented, the director shall publish the annual quality assurance fee rate on its internet website.

(3) In no case shall the fees calculated pursuant to this subdivision and collected pursuant to this article exceed the amounts allowable under federal law. If, on or before June 15 of each year, the
 director makes a determination that the fees collected pursuant to this subdivision exceed the amounts allowable under federal law, the director may reduce the add-on increase to the fee-for-service payment schedule described in Section 14129.3 only to the extent necessary to reflect the amount of fees allowable under federal law in an applicable state fiscal year.

(4) If, during a state fiscal year for which this article is operative, the actual or projected available fee amount exceeds or is less than the actual or projected aggregate fee schedule amount by more than 1 percent, the director shall adjust the annual quality assurance fee rate so that the available fee amount for the state fiscal year will approximately equal the aggregate fee schedule amount for the state fiscal year. The available fee amount for a state fiscal year shall